Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201944-2415
Exemption from liability.

There shall be no liability on the part of, and no cause of action of any nature shall rise against, any member insurer, the association or its agents or employees, the board of directors of the association, any servicing facility designated by the association in accordance with the Nebraska Property and Liability Insurance Guaranty Association Act or the agents or employees or officers of such servicing facility, or the director or his or her representatives for any action taken by them in the performance of their powers and duties under the act.

Laws 1971, LB 722, § 15;

Laws 2019, LB380, § 8.
September 1, 2019